Nevada, session 83, SB71.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 332 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.2, 1.4 and 1.6 of this
act.
Sec. 1.2. Each governing body shall post prominently on its
Internet website:
1. Information relating to the types of supplies, materials,
equipment and services which are purchased by the governing
body or its authorized representative pursuant to this chapter.
2. Procedures by which a person may request notice of
solicitations or other methods of obtaining contracts for such
purchases by the governing body or its authorized representative.
Sec. 1.4. The Commission to Study Governmental
Purchasing shall:
1. Recommend policies, programs and procedures to
encourage and promote purchasing from local businesses by local
governments in this State.
2. Create a supplier training program to educate local
businesses on the public procurement process.
3. Create a support and outreach program that includes,
without limitation, networking events and mentorship
opportunities for local businesses.
Sec. 1.6. 1. On or before November 1 of each year, each
local government in a county that has a voting member on the
Commission to Study Governmental Purchasing shall prepare and
deliver a written report to the Commission, in a form prescribed by
the Commission, for the immediately preceding fiscal year which
contains, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the
number of persons employed by the local government,
disaggregated by the categories of diverse persons. The provisions
of this paragraph do not apply if the persons employed by the local
government do not voluntarily provide such information to the
local government.
(b) Purchasing expenditures made by the local government
during the immediately preceding fiscal year, disaggregated by
discretionary and nondiscretionary expenditures.
(c) The amount and percentage of purchasing expenditures
paid by the local government to diverse businesses, disaggregated
by the categories of diverse businesses.
(d) The amount and percentage of purchasing expenditures
paid by the local government to businesses that have a physical
location and employees within this State.
(e) The amount and percentage of purchasing expenditures
paid by the local government to businesses that do not have a
physical location and employees within this State.
(f) A summary of the efforts and programs used by the local
government to encourage and increase the involvement of diverse
businesses in the public purchasing process and any efforts or
programs used by the local government to encourage the
economic development of diverse businesses.
(g) Such other information as the Commission determines is
necessary to achieve its goals.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Diverse business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a diverse person; or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more diverse persons.
(b) “Diverse person” means a person who:
(1) Is a member of a racial or ethnic minority, female or a
veteran or has a physical disability; or
(2) Identifies as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer
or intersex or any other nonheterosexual or noncisgender
orientation or gender identity or expression.
Sec. 1.8. NRS 332.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
332.215 1. Each county of this state whose population is
100,000 or more, must be a member of the Commission to Study
Governmental Purchasing which is composed of all purchasing
agents of the local governments within those counties. Each county
whose population is less than 100,000 may participate as a voting
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
member of the Commission. The members shall select a Chair from
among their number.
2. The Commission shall meet no less than quarterly or at the
call of the Chair to [study] review practices in governmental
purchasing [and laws relating thereto] and [shall] make
recommendations [with respect] to [those laws to the next regular
session of the Legislature.] improve efficiency and equity in
governmental purchasing contracts.
3. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Commission shall submit a written report to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Legislative Operations and Elections that
includes any recommendations of the Commission for legislation
relating to governmental purchasing.
Sec. 2. Chapter 333 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Administrator shall post prominently on the Internet
website of the Purchasing Division:
1. Information relating to the types of supplies, materials,
equipment and services which are purchased pursuant to this
chapter.
2. Procedures by which a person may request notice of
solicitations or other methods of obtaining contracts for such
purchases.
Secs. 3-11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. Section 3 of the NV Grow Act, being chapter 459,
Statutes of Nevada 2015, as last amended by chapter 570, Statutes
of Nevada 2019, at page 3668, is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 3. In assisting and carrying out the program
described in section 2 of this act, the Centers, as defined in
section 2 of this act, shall, without limitation, perform the
following services:
1. Analyze data;
2. Ensure that businesses participating in the program
understand the manner in which the data so analyzed will be
applied to those businesses so that the businesses may make
better business decisions and understand the current business
market in which they exist; and
3. [Mentor the businesses as to the optimum use of data
received under the program relative to the making of business
decisions; and
4.] With respect to the businesses participating in the
program:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(a) Track the business decisions and growth of each
business over the entire period of the program;
(b) Report the data tracked pursuant to paragraph (a), at
least once each 6 months, to the Division; and
(c) Ensure the development of contacts with the Office of
Economic Development and, if appropriate, the [Regional
Business Development Advisory Council for Clark County]
Commission to Study Governmental Purchasing described
in NRS 332.215 to facilitate participation in procurement
programs and to further enhance the growth of each business.
Sec. 13. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 14. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 15. Sections 11 to 20, inclusive, of the Regional Business
Development Advisory Council for Clark County Act are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 16. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)